Illinois, session 104th, HB2491.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Innovation and Technology Act 5is amended by adding Section 1-47 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 1370/1-47 new)7    Sec. 1-47. Upgrading the Community Reporting System 8(ROCS). By January 1, 2026, the Department of Innovation and 9Technology shall create a detailed action plan in order to 10replace the Community Reporting System used by the Department 11of Human Services' Division of Developmental Disabilities. The 12Department of Innovation and Technology shall work in 13collaboration with the Department of Human Services to ensure 14that the new system is operational and in use by providers of 15home and community-based services by July 1, 2026. The 16Department of Human Services shall offer training and 17technical assistance to providers of home and community-based 18services prior to implementation of the new system to ensure 19proper transition. 20    Section 10. The Department of Human Services Act is 21amended by adding Section 1-100 as follows:   HB2491- 2 -LRB104 10118 KTG 20190 b1    (20 ILCS 1305/1-100 new)2    Sec. 1-100. Rate sheet for clients of home and 3community-based services. Beginning July 1, 2026, the 4Department shall provide each provider of home and 5community-based services an updated, detailed rate sheet for 6each individual served in a community-integrated living 7arrangement by the provider at least annually or when a change 8to the individualized rate has occurred. 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 102025.